Hawaii statutes.
[§347-12.5] Randolph-Sheppard revolving
account. (a) There is established within the state treasury the
Randolph-Sheppard revolving account. The revolving account shall be used by
the department of human services for:

(1) The provision of the following benefits for blind
vendors:

(A) A retirement or pension plan;

(B) Health insurance; and

(C) Sick and vacation leave;

(2) The maintenance and replacement of equipment used
in the blind vending program;

(3) The purchase of new equipment to be used in the
blind vending program; and

(4) The provision of management services, which shall
include, but not be limited to:

(A) The hiring of consultants;

(B) The sponsoring of training seminars;

(C) Transportation;

(D) Per diem for vendors to attend meetings
of the state committee of blind vendors;

(E) Services for the state committee of blind
vendors; and

(F) Other costs related to the blind vending
program.

(b) Income from vending machines on federal,
state, and county properties that are within reasonable proximity to, and in
direct competition with, a blind vendor may be deposited into the account and
then disbursed to the blind vendor.

(c) The revolving account shall consist of
funds derived from:

(1) Vending machine income generated by federal,
state, and county operations;

(2) Any other legally accepted source of income; and

(3) Donations. [L 1991, c 70, §1]

Case Notes

As the federal adjudication path applied to disputes arising
from the Hawaii Randolph-Sheppard Act, trial court lacked subject matter
jurisdiction to decide the merits of the case. 112 H. 388, 146 P.3d 103 (2006).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next